Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1271.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XX-NFREE SPEECH IN HIGHER EDUCATIONSection 2001-N. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Benefit." A privilege granted to a student organization, including the use of a facility, the use of a channel of communication or a funding source that is available to all 1234567891011121314151617181920 student organizations at a public institution of higher education."Bias reporting system." The formal or explicit process for the reporting or solicitation of a bias incident from a campus community member concerning offensive or unwanted speech, including satire or speech labeled as a microaggression, regardless of whether the speech occurs on or off the campus of a public institution of higher education."Campus community member." Any student, student organization, administrator, faculty member, staff member or invited guest at a public institution of higher education."Invited guest." An invited guest of any student, student organization, administrator, faculty member or staff member at a public institution of higher education."Protected expressive activity." An expression of speech by a campus community member that is protected by Federal or State law, including speech pertaining to an opinion or a political belief or affiliation, through the use of verbal, written, audio-visual or electronic means to communicate an idea to another, regardless of whether the expression occurs on or off the campus of a public institution of higher education. The term includes a form of peaceful assembly, a protest, a speech, a guest speaker, the distribution of literature, carrying a sign or circulating a petition."Public institution of higher education." Any of the following:(1) A community college operating under Article XIX-A. (2) A rural regional college established under Article XIX-G.(3) A university within the State System of Higher 20250HB1271PN1424 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Education under Article XX-A.(4) A State-related institution as defined in section 2001-C.(5) The Thaddeus Stevens College of Technology. (6) The Pennsylvania College of Technology. "Quid pro quo sexual harassment." Explicitly or implicitly conditioning a student's participation in an education program or activity or basing an educational decision on the student's submission to unwelcome sexual advances, requests for sexual favors or other verbal, nonverbal or physical conduct of a sexual nature."Student." An individual who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis as an undergraduate or graduate student in a public institution of higher education."Student-on-student harassment." Conduct directed by a student or student organization toward another student or student organization that is so unwelcome, severe, pervasive and subjectively and objectively offensive that the student or student organization is effectively denied equal access to an educational opportunity or benefit provided by a public institution of higher education."Student organization." Any of the following:(1) An officially recognized group, comprised of students, at a public institution of higher education.(2) A group seeking official recognition that receives, or is seeking to receive, a benefit."True threat." A statement by a speaker that communicates a serious expression of an intent to commit an act of violence against a particular individual or group of individuals.Section 2002-N. Prohibition on bias reporting system.20250HB1271PN1424 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A public institution of higher education may not establish, maintain or otherwise implement a bias reporting system.Section 2003-N. Prohibition on punishment for protected speech.A public institution of higher education may not investigate, threaten disciplinary action or otherwise punish a campus community member for a protected expressive activity.Section 2004-N. Establishment of student-on-student harassment policy.A public institution of higher education shall establish and maintain a policy that prohibits student-on-student harassment. The public institution of higher education may not threaten disciplinary action or otherwise punish a student or student organization's expression as student-on-student harassment if the expression does not constitute student-on-student harassment.Section 2005-N. Prohibition on excessive security fee.A public institution of higher education may not charge a security fee in excess of the standard fee to secure an event for a student or student organization based on any of the following:(1) The content of the student or student organization's expression.(2) The content of an invited guest's expression.(3) The anticipated reaction to an invited guest's expression.Section 2006-N. Construction.Nothing in this article shall be construed to prevent a public institution of higher education from doing any of the following:(1) Investigating or soliciting information about 20250HB1271PN1424 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 potentially illegal speech, speech associated with a potentially illegal activity or an incident when protected expressive activity may have been potentially curtailed.(2) Imposing a reasonable time, place and manner restriction on a protected expressive activity that is narrowly tailored to serve a significant institutional interest.(3) Restricting speech that is not protected by the First Amendment to the Constitution of the United States, including:(i) A violation of Federal or State law.(ii) An expression that a court has deemed unprotected defamation.(iii) Student-on-student harassment.(iv) Quid pro quo sexual harassment.(v) A true threat.(vi) An unjustifiable invasion of privacy or confidentiality not involving a matter of public concern.Section 2007-N. Remedies. (a) Actions.--A current or former campus community member aggrieved by a violation of this article may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin a violation of this article or to seek appropriate relief, including reasonable court costs, reasonable attorney fees and actual damages.(b) Awards.--If a court finds that a current or former campus community member is aggrieved by a violation of this article, the court shall award the aggrieved person damages of at least $5,000, or actual damages, whichever is greater.(c) Defenses or counterclaims.--A current or former campus community member aggrieved by a violation of this article may 20250HB1271PN1424 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assert the violation as a defense or counterclaim in a disciplinary action or in a civil or administrative proceeding involving the current or former campus community member.(d) Limitations.--A current or former campus community member must bring an action for a violation of this article within one year after the date the cause of action accrues. For the purpose of calculating the one-year limitation period, each day that the violation persists, or each day that a policy in violation of this article remains in effect, constitutes a new violation of this article and shall be considered a day that the cause of action has accrued.(e) Immunity.--A public institution of higher education that violates this article shall not be immune from suit or liability for the violation.(f) Construction.--Nothing in this article shall be interpreted to limit other remedies available to a current or former campus community member.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1271PN1424 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718